index.aff
SET UTF-8					
FLAG long					
NOSUGGEST XX					
FULLSTRIP					
TRY ъьѣѫаеноияртвслкмпздубчгцжхшфйщюЪЬѢѪАЕНОИЯРТВСЛКМПЗДУБЧГЦЖХШФЙЩЮ					
					
REP	101				
REP	те	тѣ			
REP	тѣ	те			
REP	ът	ътъ			
REP	ят	ятъ			
REP	ят	ьтъ			
REP	тта	тьта			
REP	бел	бѣл			
REP	бял	бѣл			
REP	вед	вѣд			
REP	вяд	вѣд			
REP	вер	вѣр			
REP	вяр	вѣр			
REP	все	всѣ			
REP	вся	всѣ			
REP	две	двѣ			
REP	двете	двѣтѣ			
REP	дед	дѣд			
REP	дяд	дѣд			
REP	дел	дѣл			
REP	дял	дѣл			
REP	дес	дѣс			
REP	дяс	дѣс			
REP	леб	лѣб			
REP	ляб	лѣб			
REP	лев	лѣв			
REP	ляв	лѣв			
REP	лег	лѣг			
REP	ляг	лѣг			
REP	мен	мѣн			
REP	мян	мѣн			
REP	мер	мѣр			
REP	мяр	мѣр			
REP	мест	мѣст			
REP	мяст	мѣст			
REP	мле	млѣ			
REP	мля	млѣ			
REP	нем	нѣм			
REP	ням	нѣм			
REP	пре	прѣ			
REP	пря	прѣ			
REP	пред	прѣд			
REP	свет	свѣт			
REP	свят	свѣт			
REP	сег	сѣг			
REP	сяг	сѣг			
REP	свет	свѣт			
REP	свят	свѣт			
REP	сред	срѣд			
REP	сряд	срѣд			
REP	тех	тѣх			
REP	тях	тѣх			
REP	цел	цѣл			
REP	цял	цѣл			
REP	бъд	бѫд			
REP	въг	вѫг			
REP	въд	вѫд			
REP	вът	вѫт			
REP	гъс	гѫс			
REP	зъб	зѫб			
REP	кръ	крѫ			
REP	къде	кѫдѣ			
REP	кът	кѫт			
REP	къщ	кѫщ			
REP	лъч	лѫч			
REP	мък	мѫк			
REP	мъч	мѫч			
REP	мъж	мѫж			
REP	път	пѫт			
REP	ръб	рѫб			
REP	рък	рѫк			
REP	ръч	рѫч			
REP	скъп	скѫп			
REP	съд	сѫд			
REP	същ	сѫщ			
REP	тъг	тѫг			
REP	тъж	тѫж			
REP	тъп	тѫп			
REP	шт	щ			
REP	ис	из			
REP	нат	над			
REP	од	от			
REP	рас	раз			
REP	в	въ			
REP	с	съ			
REP	во	въ			
REP	со	съ			
REP	ър	ръ			
REP	ръ	ър			
REP	ъл	лъ			
REP	лъ	ъл			
REP	а	ъ			
REP	е	ѣ			
REP	й	ѝ			
REP	ъ	ѫ			
REP	ъ	а			
REP	ъ	ь			
REP	ь	ъ			
REP	я	ѣ			
REP	ѫ	ъ			
REP	ѣ	я			
REP	ѣ	е			
					
MAP	7				
MAP	еѣя				
MAP	аъѫ				
MAP	ъь				
MAP	ий				
MAP	ая				
MAP	еи				
MAP	оу				
					
SFX	A0	Y	45		
SFX	A0		и	и	.
SFX	A0		и	ия	.
SFX	A0		и	иятъ	.
SFX	A0		и	ий	.
SFX	A0		и	а	.
SFX	A0		и	ата	.
SFX	A0		и	о	.
SFX	A0		и	ото	.
SFX	A0		и	и	.
SFX	A0		и	итѣ	.
SFX	A0		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	A0		ъ	ия	.
SFX	A0		ъ	иятъ	.
SFX	A0		ъ	ий	.
SFX	A0		ъ	а	.
SFX	A0		ъ	ата	.
SFX	A0		ъ	о	[^ш]ъ
SFX	A0		ъ	ото	[^ш]ъ
SFX	A0		ъ	о	ошъ
SFX	A0		ъ	ото	ошъ
SFX	A0		ъ	е	[^о]шъ
SFX	A0		ъ	ето	[^о]шъ
SFX	A0		ъ	и	.
SFX	A0		ъ	итѣ	.
SFX	A0		ь	ь	.
SFX	A0		ь	ия	.
SFX	A0		ь	иятъ	.
SFX	A0		ь	ий	.
SFX	A0		ь	я	.
SFX	A0		ь	ята	.
SFX	A0		ь	ьо	.
SFX	A0		ь	ьото	.
SFX	A0		ь	и	.
SFX	A0		ь	итѣ	.
SFX	A0		й	й	.
SFX	A0		й	я	.
SFX	A0		й	ятъ	.
SFX	A0		й	йта	.
SFX	A0		й	ята	.
SFX	A0		й	е	.
SFX	A0		й	ето	.
SFX	A0		й	йто	.
SFX	A0		й	и	.
SFX	A0		й	итѣ	.
SFX	A0		й	йтѣ	.
					
SFX	A1	Y	30		
SFX	A1		ви	ви	.
SFX	A1		ви	вия	.
SFX	A1		ви	виятъ	.
SFX	A1		ви	вий	.
SFX	A1		ви	вя	.
SFX	A1		ви	вята	.
SFX	A1		ви	ве	.
SFX	A1		ви	вето	.
SFX	A1		ви	ви	.
SFX	A1		ви	витѣ	.
SFX	A1		зи	зи	.
SFX	A1		зи	зия	.
SFX	A1		зи	зиятъ	.
SFX	A1		зи	зий	.
SFX	A1		зи	зя	.
SFX	A1		зи	зята	.
SFX	A1		зи	зе	.
SFX	A1		зи	зето	.
SFX	A1		зи	зи	.
SFX	A1		зи	зитѣ	.
SFX	A1		чи	чи	.
SFX	A1		чи	чия	.
SFX	A1		чи	чиятъ	.
SFX	A1		чи	чий	.
SFX	A1		чи	ча	.
SFX	A1		чи	чата	.
SFX	A1		чи	че	.
SFX	A1		чи	чето	.
SFX	A1		чи	чи	.
SFX	A1		чи	читѣ	.
					
SFX	A2	Y	19		
SFX	A2		енъ	енъ	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ния	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ниятъ	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ний	.
SFX	A2		енъ	на	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ната	.
SFX	A2		енъ	но	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ното	.
SFX	A2		енъ	ни	.
SFX	A2		енъ	нитѣ	.
SFX	A2		инъ	инъ	.
SFX	A2		инъ	иния	.
SFX	A2		инъ	иниятъ	.
SFX	A2		инъ	на	.
SFX	A2		инъ	ната	.
SFX	A2		инъ	но	.
SFX	A2		инъ	ното	.
SFX	A2		инъ	ни	.
SFX	A2		инъ	нитѣ	.
					
SFX	A4	Y	82		
SFX	A4		ъвъ	ъвъ	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	вия	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	виятъ	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	вий	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	ва	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	вата	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	во	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	вото	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	ви	.
SFX	A4		ъвъ	витѣ	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	ъгъ	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гия	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гиятъ	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гий	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	га	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гата	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	го	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гото	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	ги	.
SFX	A4		ъгъ	гитѣ	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	ъкъ	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	кия	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	киятъ	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	кий	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	ка	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	ката	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	ко	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	кото	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	ки	.
SFX	A4		ъкъ	китѣ	.
SFX	A4		ълъ	ълъ/L1	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	ъръ	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	рия	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	риятъ	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	рий	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	ра	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	рата	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	ро	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	рото	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	ри	.
SFX	A4		ъръ	ритѣ	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвия	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвиятъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвий	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣва	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвата	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣво	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвото	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣви	.
SFX	A4		ѣвъ	ѣвитѣ	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкия	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкиятъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкий	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣка	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣката	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣко	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкото	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣки	.
SFX	A4		ѣкъ	ѣкитѣ	.
SFX	A4		ѣлъ	ѣлъ/L5	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмия	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмиятъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмий	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣма	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмата	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмо	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмото	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣми	.
SFX	A4		ѣмъ	ѣмитѣ	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпия	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпиятъ	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпий	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпа	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпата	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпо	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпото	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпи	.
SFX	A4		ѣпъ	ѣпитѣ	.
					
SFX	A5	Y	4		
SFX	A5		ръбъ	ърбъ/A0	.
SFX	A5		ръзъ	ързъ/A0	.
SFX	A5		ръхъ	ърхъ/A0	.
SFX	A5		ързъкъ	ръзъкъ/A4	.
					
SFX	A6	Y	10		
SFX	A6		енъ	енъ	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йния	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йниятъ	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йна	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йната	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йний	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йно	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йното	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йни	.
SFX	A6		енъ	йнитѣ	.
					
//SFX	A7	Y	0		
					
SFX	A8	Y	2		
SFX	A8		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	A8		и	и	.
					
SFX	B0	Y	4		
SFX	B0		ь	ь	.
SFX	B0		ь	ьта	.
SFX	B0		ь	и	.
SFX	B0		ь	итѣ	.
					
SFX	B1	Y	2		
SFX	B1		0	0	.
SFX	B1		0	та	.
					
SFX	B2	Y	4		
SFX	B2		а	а	.
SFX	B2		а	ата	.
SFX	B2		и	и	.
SFX	B2		и	итѣ	.
					
SFX	B3	Y	12		
SFX	B3		ень	ень	.
SFX	B3		ень	еньта	.
SFX	B3		ень	ни	.
SFX	B3		ень	нитѣ	.
SFX	B3		ъль	ъль	.
SFX	B3		ъль	ъльта	.
SFX	B3		ъль	ли	.
SFX	B3		ъль	литѣ	.
SFX	B3		ънь	ънь	.
SFX	B3		ънь	ъньта	.
SFX	B3		ънь	ни	.
SFX	B3		ънь	нитѣ	.
					
SFX	B4	Y	8		
SFX	B4		ръвь	ръвь	.
SFX	B4		ръвь	ръвьта	.
SFX	B4		ръвь	ърви	.
SFX	B4		ръвь	ървитѣ	.
SFX	B4		ръбь	ръбь	.
SFX	B4		ръбь	ръбьта	.
SFX	B4		ръбь	ърби	.
SFX	B4		ръбь	ърбитѣ	.
					
//SFX	B5	Y	0		
					
SFX	C0	Y	43		
SFX	C0		единъ	единъ/A2	.
SFX	C0		два	два	.
SFX	C0		два	двата	.
SFX	C0		два	двѣ	.
SFX	C0		два	двѣтѣ	.
SFX	C0		два	двѣ	.
SFX	C0		два	двѣтѣ	.
SFX	C0		два	двама	.
SFX	C0		два	двамата	.
SFX	C0		ри	ри	.
SFX	C0		ри	ритѣ	.
SFX	C0		ри	ри	.
SFX	C0		ри	ритѣ	.
SFX	C0		ри	ри	.
SFX	C0		ри	ритѣ	.
SFX	C0		ри	рима	.
SFX	C0		ри	римата	.
SFX	C0		ть	ть	.
SFX	C0		ть	тьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		ть	ть	.
SFX	C0		ть	тьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		ть	ть	.
SFX	C0		ть	тьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		ть	тима	.
SFX	C0		ть	тимата	.
SFX	C0		емь	емь	.
SFX	C0		емь	емьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		емь	емь	.
SFX	C0		емь	емьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		емь	емь	.
SFX	C0		емь	емьтѣ	.
SFX	C0		емь	мина	.
SFX	C0		емь	мината	.
SFX	C0		а	а	.
SFX	C0		а	ата	.
SFX	C0		а	и	.
SFX	C0		а	итѣ	.
SFX	C0		а	а	.
SFX	C0		а	ата	.
SFX	C0		а	а	.
SFX	C0		а	ата	.
SFX	C0		а	а	.
SFX	C0		а	ата	.
					
SFX	C1	Y	15		
SFX	C1		на	на	.
SFX	C1		на	ната	.
SFX	C1		нь	нь	.
SFX	C1		нь	ньтѣ	.
SFX	C1		нь	нь	.
SFX	C1		нь	ньтѣ	.
SFX	C1		нь	нь	.
SFX	C1		нь	ньтѣ	.
SFX	C1		нь	на	.
SFX	C1		нь	ната	.
SFX	C1		ть	ть/C0	.
SFX	C1		ть	тина	.
SFX	C1		ть	тината	.
SFX	C1		ъ	ъ/D9	.
SFX	C1		ъ	а	.
					
SFX	C2	Y	8		
SFX	C2		0	0	.
SFX	C2		0	тѣ	.
SFX	C2		0	0	.
SFX	C2		0	тѣ	.
SFX	C2		0	0	.
SFX	C2		0	тѣ	.
SFX	C2		0	тина	.
SFX	C2		0	тината	.
					
SFX	C3	Y	3		
SFX	C3		пръвъ	пръвъ	.
SFX	C3		пръвъ	първи/A0	.
SFX	C3		и	и/A0	.
					
SFX	D0	Y	5		
SFX	D0		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	D0		ъ	а	.
SFX	D0		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	D0		ъ	ове	.
SFX	D0		ъ	оветѣ	.
					
SFX	D1	Y	5		
SFX	D1		й	й	.
SFX	D1		й	я	.
SFX	D1		й	ятъ	.
SFX	D1		й	еве	.
SFX	D1		й	еветѣ	.
					
SFX	D2	Y	10		
SFX	D2		й	й	.
SFX	D2		й	я	.
SFX	D2		й	ятъ	.
SFX	D2		й	йове	.
SFX	D2		й	йоветѣ	.
SFX	D2		ь	ь	.
SFX	D2		ь	я	.
SFX	D2		ь	ьтъ	.
SFX	D2		ь	ьове	.
SFX	D2		ь	ьоветѣ	.
					
SFX	D3	Y	15		
SFX	D3		й	й	.
SFX	D3		й	я	.
SFX	D3		й	ятъ	.
SFX	D3		й	ища	.
SFX	D3		й	ищата	.
SFX	D3		ь	ь	.
SFX	D3		ь	я	.
SFX	D3		ь	ьтъ	.
SFX	D3		ь	ища	.
SFX	D3		ь	ищата	.
SFX	D3		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	D3		ъ	а	.
SFX	D3		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	D3		ъ	ища	.
SFX	D3		ъ	ищата	.
					
