index.dic
анаеробенъ/A2
байцъ/D0
бактериенъ/A6
баленъ/A2
безброенъ/A6
бездържавность/B0
безоченъ/A2
безплановъ/A0
безстопанственость/B0
бета/B1
битъ/D0F7
благовоненъ/A2
благоговѣенъ/A6
бой/D1F7
босичъкъ/A4
браншъ/D0
брашненость/B0
брой/D1
бръзъ/A5
бързоструенъ/A6
варь/B1F5
ватъ/D0F7
великоруски/A0
ветеринаренъ/A2
вносъ/D0
вой/D1
врабчи/A1
връвь/B4F5
врѣлъ/A4
врѣменность/B0
всинца/B2
всѣкидневенъ/A2
възпълничъкъ/A4
вълчи/A1
вѫглища/B2
вѫси/B2
гащета/B2F6
гащи/B2F6
гей/D2
геодезки/A0
гланцъ/D0
гноенъ/A6
гнусь/B1
гнѫсливость/B0
гнѫсь/B1
голѣмичъкъ/A4
готъ/A8
грифъ/D0F7
гръдь/B1
грънци/B2
гѫстообрасълъ/A4
данни/B2
два/C0
двадесети/C3
двайсеть/C1
двайсти/C3
дванадесети/C3
дванайсеть/C1
дванайсти/C3
двери/B2
двувръхъ/A5
двугръбъ/A5
двучлененъ/A2
двѣста/C2
двѣстѣ/C2
деветдесети/C3
девети/C3
деветнадесети/C3
деветнадесеть/C1
деветнайсти/C3
деветстотинь/C1
деветь/C0
денкъ/D0F7
децилионъ/C1
дечица/B2
дечурлига/B2
джинси/B2
диференциранъ/A0
длань/B0F5
доенъ/A6
друмъ/D3F7
душъ/D0F7
дънки/B2
дързъкъ/A5
дяволитость/B0
дѣди/B2
единадесети/C3
единадесеть/C1
единъ/C0
еднакъвъ/A4
едновръхъ/A5
едногръбъ/A5
едноимененъ/A2
емърливъ/A0
жарь/B1F5
жестокосърдечность/B0
житиенъ/A6
жлъчь/B1
загрубѣлъ/A4
занемареность/B0
заобиколенъ/A2
здрачъ/D0
земедѣлски/A0
зеть/D2D8
златовръхъ/A5
змей/D2D8
зной/D1
игривость/B0
избѣлѣлъ/A4
извънпартиенъ/A6
изневиделица/B1
изтекълъ/A4
икебана/B1
илири/B2
индецилионъ/C1
интермолекуляренъ/A2
интернационалистически/A0
каль/B1F5
картофки/B2
катеричи/A1
кварта/B1
квинтилионъ/C1
кей/D2
кефъ/D0F7
клей/D1F7
клещи/B2F6
клубъ/D0F7
кози/A1
кокетливость/B0
кома/B1
комбиниранъ/A0
континенталенъ/A2
кофти/A8
кочи/A1
крави/A1
край/D3F7
кръвь/B4F5
кръстопѫть/D3F7
крѣпъкъ/A4
кукувичи/A1
къртичи/A1
къръ/D3
къснозрѣенъ/A6
кюлоти/B2F6
кюпъ/D0F7
лай/D1
ластовичи/A1
латиница/B1
лимоновъ/A0
лисичи/A1
лой/B1F5
лястовичи/A1
макрокосмиченъ/A2
макъ/D0F7
малцина/C1
малъкъ/A4
марихуана/B1F2
мастиленоструенъ/A6
мечи/A1
мечтателность/B0
милионъ/C1
мисленъ/A0
мисъль/B3F4
младежь/B1
многостаенъ/A6
мореходенъ/A2
мравчи/A1
мъничъкъ/A4
мѣра/B1F3
навуща/B1
наполеонки/B2
научность/B0
нацупенъ/A0
неблагопристоенъ/A6
негладъкъ/A4
нееднакъвъ/A4
незадоволителенъ/A2
незапалимъ/A0
неизисканость/B0
неловъкъ/A4
ненасоченъ/A0
необстоенъ/A6
неподправеность/B0
неподражаемъ/A0
непрѣкъ/A4
неразмѣняемъ/A0
неразточителенъ/A2
неритмичность/B0
неслучаенъ/A6
неузрѣлъ/A4
неутѫпканъ/A0
нехаенъ/A6
нечовѣчность/B0
новодошълъ/A4
нонилионъ/C1
нула/C0
нѣщица/B2
обертонъ/D0D9
общоупотрѣбителенъ/A2
овощи/B2
овчи/A1
октилионъ/C1
омърлушенъ/A0
орань/B1
орѫдеенъ/A6
осемдесети/C3
осемнадесеть/C1
осемнайсти/C3
осемстотинь/C1
осемь/C0
островръхъ/A5
откѫслечность/B0
отневиделица/B1
пай/D1F7
патроненъ/A2
петдесети/C3
петнадесети/C3
петнадесеть/C1
петстотинь/C1
петь/C0
питеенъ/A6
платформенъ/A0
плитъкъ/A4
плъть/B1
подвидъ/D0
покорность/B0
полуразголенъ/A2
полусънь/D3
помисъль/B3
прадѣди/B2
прастаръ/A0
прахь/B1F5
присоенъ/A6
приятничъкъ/A4
промисъль/B3
промишленость/B0
противоракетенъ/A2
пръвъ/C3
прѣдумисъль/B3
прѣсносоленъ/A0
птичи/A1
пуйчи/A1
пултъ/D0F7
пъдпъдъчи/A1
пѣсень/B3F4
пѫть/D3F7
равностоенъ/A6
раздробеность/B0
разнебитенъ/A2
рай/D2
рисковъ/A0
ровъкъ/A4
рой/D1
ръжь/B1F5
сайтъ/D0F7
самодеенъ/A6
сандалки/B2
своенравность/B0
сврачи/A1
свѣтиленъ/A2
седемнадесети/C3
седемнадесеть/C1
седемстотинь/C1
седемь/C0
седми/C3
секси/A8
семпълъ/A4
септилионъ/C1
сертъ/A8
скапанъ/A0
скръбь/B4F5
сладкопоенъ/A6
слой/D1F7
снѣжнобѣлъ/A4
сой/D1
сосъ/D0F7
спрей/D2
спусъченъ/A2
старость/B0F5
сто/C2
строенъ/A6
строй/D1F7
стръвь/B4F5
стъбленъ/A0
съблазънь/B3
сънь/D3F7
сѫдъ/D0F7
тара/B1
тежъкъ/A4
тенденциозенъ/A2
траки/B2
тракъ/D0
траншеенъ/A6
три/C0
тридесети/C3
тридесеть/C1
трийсеть/C1
тринадесети/C3
тринадесеть/C1
триста/C2
трицифровъ/A0
тъкань/B0F5
тѫповръхъ/A5
уй/XXD2
умъ/D0
упоенъ/A6
условенъ/A2
филцъ/D0
фронтовъ/A0
хиляда/C0
хипогрифъ/D0
хора/B2F6
хубавичъкъ/A4
хуй/XXD2
цель/B0F3
циментенъ/A2
чай/D1F7
четвърти/C3
четирдесеть/C3
четири/C0
четиридесеть/C1
четирийсти/C3
четиринайсти/C3
чимъ/D0F7
човѣколюбивъ/A0
чорапогащи/B2
шейсети/C3
шейсеть/C1
шести/C3
шестнайсти/C3
шестстотинь/C1
шесть/C0
шиенъ/A6
шикъ/A8
ширь/B1
шокъ/D0
юрдечи/A1
яребичи/A1
